North Carolina statutes. Chapter 10B. Notaries.
Part 6. Enforcement.

§ 10B-145.
Restriction or revocation of registration.

The Secretary or the Secretary’s designee shall have the authority to warn, restrict, suspend, or revoke an electronic notary registration for a violation of this Chapter and on any ground for which electronic notary registration may be denied under this Chapter.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-146.
Wrongful manufacture, distribution, or possession of software or hardware.

Any person who knowingly creates, manufactures, or distributes software for the purpose of allowing a person to act as an electronic notary without being commissioned and registered in accordance with this act shall be guilty of a Class G felony.

Any person who wrongfully obtains, conceals, damages, or destroys the certificate, disk, coding, card, program, software, file, or hardware enabling an electronic notary to affix an official electronic signature is guilty of a Class I felony.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§§ 10B-147 through 10B-199.

Reserved for future codification purposes.